Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 21.2 The Rhode Island Substance Abuse Prevention Act

16-21.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as “The Rhode Island Substance Abuse Prevention Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 375, § 1.

16-21.2-2.
Declaration of purpose.

In recognition of the growing problem of substance use and abuse that municipalities face the purpose of this chapter is as follows:

To promote the opportunity for municipalities to establish a comprehensive substance abuse prevention program addressing the specific needs of each individual municipality.

To encourage the development of partnership among municipal governments, school systems, parents, and human service providers to serve the interest of the community in addressing the need for a comprehensive substance abuse prevention program.

To promote a substance abuse prevention program in every community.

To provide financial assistance for the planning, establishment, and operation of substance abuse prevention programs.

To encourage municipal governments, in cooperation with school systems and human services organizations to jointly assess the extent of the substance abuse problem in their community.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 375, § 1.

16-21.2-3.
Authority of municipal governments.

All municipal governments or their designated agents shall have the power to establish, operate, conduct, and/or make provision for programs to provide a comprehensive substance abuse prevention program.

The appropriate municipal authority shall adopt rules and regulations governing the substance abuse prevention program including an application and contracting procedure by which qualified groups may apply to operate a substance abuse prevention program.

Substance abuse prevention programs shall comply with all applicable provisions of the general laws with all applicable state rules and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 2.

16-21.2-4.
Substance abuse prevention program.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall be charged with the administration of this chapter and shall provide grants to assist in the planning, establishment, and operation of substance abuse prevention programs. Grants under this section shall be made to municipal governments or their designated agents according to the following guidelines:

The maximum grant shall be one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000); provided, however, in the event that available funding exceeds $1.6 million in a fiscal year, those surplus funds are to be divided proportionately among the cities and towns on a per capita basis but in no event shall the city of Providence exceed a maximum grant cap of $175,000.00.

In order to obtain a grant, the municipality or its designated agent must in the first year:

Demonstrate the municipality’s need for a comprehensive substance abuse program in the areas of prevention and education.

Demonstrate that the municipality has established by appropriate legislative or executive action, a substance abuse prevention council which shall assist in assessing the needs and resources of the community, developing a three (3) year plan of action addressing the identified needs, the operation and implementation of the overall substance abuse prevention program; coordinating existing services such as law enforcement, prevention, treatment, and education; consisting of representatives of the municipal government, representatives of the school system, parents, and human service providers.

Demonstrate the municipality’s ability to develop a plan of implementation of a comprehensive three (3) year substance abuse prevention program based on the specific needs of the community to include high risk populations of adolescents, children of substance abusers, and primary education school aged children.

Agree to conduct a survey/questionnaire of the student population designed to establish the extent of the use and abuse of drugs and alcohol in students throughout the local community’s school population.

Demonstrate that at least twenty percent (20%) of the cost of the proposed program will be contributed either in cash or in-kind by public or private resources within the municipality.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall adopt rules and regulations necessary and appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 14, § 8; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 33.

16-21.2-5.
Funding of substance abuse prevention program.

Money to fund the Rhode Island Substance Abuse Prevention Act shall be appropriated from state general revenues and shall be raised by assessing an additional penalty of thirty dollars ($30.00) for all speeding violations as set forth in § 31-43-5.1. The money shall be deposited as general revenues. The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals may utilize up to ten percent (10%) of the sums appropriated for the purpose of administering the substance abuse prevention program.

Grants made under this chapter shall not exceed money available in the substance abuse prevention program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. l988, ch. 569, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 14, § 8; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 177; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 27; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 33.

16-21.2-6.
Timetable for grant applications and disbursement.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall establish guidelines and criteria for the acceptance of grant applications and the disbursement of grants.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 14, § 8; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 33.

16-21.2-7.
Use of funds restricted to substance abuse prevention.

All funds awarded to municipal governments under the provisions of this chapter shall be held in a separate account and not placed in the municipal government’s general fund and shall only be used in furtherance of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 375, § 1.

16-21.2-8.
The duties of the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

The director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals or his or her designated agent shall make an annual report by September 1 of each year to the governor and the general assembly on the administration of the program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 14, § 8; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 33.

16-21.2-9.
Permanent legislative oversight commission on substance abuse prevention.

There is established a permanent legislative oversight commission on substance abuse prevention whose purpose it shall be to oversee the implementation and administration of the Rhode Island Substance Abuse Prevention Act and to advise and make recommendations to the general assembly as to the adequacy and efficiency of all statutes, rules, regulations, guidelines, practices, and programs relating to substance abuse prevention. The commission shall consist of twelve (12) members: five (5) members shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives from among the members of the house of representatives, not more than four (4) of whom shall be from the same political party; three (3) members shall be appointed by the president of the senate from among the members of the senate, not more than two (2) of whom shall be from the same political party; and one member (ex officio) shall be the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and one member (ex officio) shall be the director of the department of health or designee; and a Rhode Island Substance Abuse Prevention Act task force member to be appointed by the chairperson of the commission; and a public member appointed by the chairperson of the commission. The chairperson of the commission shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. Members of the commission shall serve without compensation, except that they shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties under this section. The commission may request and shall receive from any instrumentality of the state, including the division of substance abuse of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and from any municipality or any instrumentality of a municipality, any information and assistance that it deems necessary for the proper execution of its powers and duties under this section. The commission shall meet at least quarterly and shall report at least annually to the general assembly on its findings and recommendations with respect to:

All existing substance abuse prevention programs;

All rules, regulations, and guidelines promulgated pursuant to the Rhode Island Substance Abuse Prevention Act;

Administration of the Rhode Island Substance Abuse Prevention Act; and

Any other matters relating to substance abuse prevention efforts in the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 284, § 6; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 14, § 8; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 14; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 33.

16-21.2-10.
Severability.

If any provisions of this chapter are declared unconstitutional, or the applicability of any provisions to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of this chapter and its applicability to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 375, § 1.

16-21.2-11.
Devices prohibited.

Any student enrolled in any secondary or elementary school shall be prohibited from carrying, possessing or using a paging device of any kind or a laser pointer of any kind on school property, except with the written consent of the principal of the school in which the student is enrolled.

The penalty for violation of this section shall be the confiscation of the device.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 475, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 486, § 1.